Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,113
Approval of amendment.

(1) An amendment to the articles of organization shall be approved by at least a two-thirds vote of members voting at the meeting.

(2) An amendment to the bylaws shall be approved by at least a majority vote of members voting at the meeting and by at least a majority of investor members voting at the meeting.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 113.